portugues.dict
Calvino/it
Cavaco/ti
Espinoza/ti
Hitler/i
Marcelo/ti
Quixote/it
Sandino/ti
Wagner/i
absoluto/fpmti
academia/pt
acrobata/ip
adiposo/fd
aeroplano/pi
agressivo/fpdm
ala/pt
alarme/tip
alegoria/pti
alfabeto/pti
alpino/fpti
alquimia/pt
amigo/lhfp
amoral/pid
amoroso/fpdm
analfabeto/fip
andebol/t
animal/pti
anjo/plh
anterior/pmd
anticorporativo/i
antipapa/tip
antropomorfo/i
arranjo/fptiSR
arterial/pd
asceta/pi
atado/fplh
atrativo/fpd
auto/pti
babado/fplh
bairro/pti
bala/pt
banal/dmp
base/pt
beijo/lp
bicho/fplG
bigode/fpl
bilateral/pmi
bissexual/dp
bocado/pl
bolo/pl
bolsa/pht
bom/lp
boneco/lfp
bonito/fplh
boxe/t
brasileiro/fpiG
brinco/pl
burla/t
burro/fplhG
cabelo/pl
cabrito/fplh
cachorro/plG
cal/pt
calado/fplhm
caloso/fd
campo/pti
canto/pl
capacho/lpG
caravana/pi
carnoso/fpd
cartesiano/fpi
cavalo/pl
cavo/fdp
cedo/l
censual/t
central/ptidm
cheiro/pl
chulo/tipGf
ciente/tip
cinzento/fpit
cirroso/d
cisco/pl
clerical/pti
coelho/lhfp
coitado/fplh
coletivo/fpmtid
coluna/pt
comercial/pmti
compassivo/fpd
comutativo/fpd
conceptual/pmti
concerto/pt
conetivo/fpd
conflituoso/fpd
conforme/pidt
constitucional/pmtid
consumo/pti
continental/pd
contraponto/tp
cooperativo/fpti
copo/ptl
cordial/mdp
corno/pl
corpo/pl
coxo/fpl
cravo/plt
criminal/ptdm
cromato/i
cultura/ptiu
cultural/pmi
curial/id
decadente/tip
demagogo/ti
denso/fpmd
despesa/pit
desporto/pti
destrutivo/fdp
devagar/l
diabo/pflh
direito/fplh
doce/pmpt
dual/ptid
duche/pt
economia/pt
eletronegativo/pd
empregado/lpf
enigma/t
eremita/pi
escolar/pdE
esgrima/t
espanhol/ip
esponjoso/d
essencial/pmt
esteta/ip
estratego/fpt
eventual/pmd
exclusive/i
expansivo/fd
extraterritorial/d
faccioso/id
fado/tlp
fatal/pmtid
ferro/pl
festivo/pdfm
feudal/ptid
fidalgo/pflhG
figura/pht
filho/fplh
flatuoso/d
flora/t
fofo/fplhG
forma/pt
fraco/pfmlh
fraterno/pfd
frente/pi
fuliginoso/d
fundo/pmt
furo/pl
gancho/pl
garboso/d
gato/fplh
gatuno/ifp
gazeta/tp
globoso/pfd
golpe/pti
gordo/fplh
gosto/pl
governo/ptiS
gramatical/pmi
granuloso/fpd
guitarra/pt
heleno/tip
homem/plu
hostil/mdp
idiota/piG
imanente/pt
imaturo/pdf
imoral/ptid
imparcial/mdp
importuno/md
inativo/pfd
incorporal/d
independente/pmt
individual/pmtid
inexpressivo/fpmd
infanta/t
infernal/dm
insalubre/pd
insubstancial/d
intelectual/pidtm
intempestivo/mdfp
interior/pmd
isomorfo/pfi
jeito/lp
jovem/plh
junto/pfmlh
laborioso/fpmd
laico/fidp
laxo/i
leal/pimt
liberto/pft
limpo/fplh
lira/pi
livro/pl
locomotivo/fd
macabro/pfim
macaco/fplhG
macho/pit
magneto/i
manso/fpmlh
marina/pi
martelo/pl
material/mtidp
mecenato/i
mercantil/pti
militar/pmtipXYn
ministerial/pti
mito/pi
modal/pid
molho/pl
momento/pl
mono/fti
monograma/t
monte/pl
morgado/pflh
morto/fplh
motociclo/tip
motora/pt
mucoso/fdp
mulato/pflh
nacional/ptidm
naifa/t
namorado/fpxlh
nasal/pdp
natura/ti
negro/pflh
nicotino/fi
normativo/fpd
norte/tS
ocidental/ptid
oculto/pftim
olho/pl
opcional/pmd
ortopedia/t
pacote/pl
pai/pl
palaciano/fpi
paleozoologia/qt
palmo/pl
pano/pl
parcial/pmtd
parental/pd
passado/pti
pato/pflh
pau/pl
peculiar/pd
pedagogo/pfti
peixe/pl
perdido/pflh
perspetivo/fid
piada/thp
pinheiro/pl
poliglota/ip
pombo/pflh
ponto/pl
porco/fpmlh
povo/pl
precoce/mdp
preponderante/pi
presidencial/pti
preto/pflh
profissional/pmi
prosa/pt
provincial/pi
pueril/idp
quieto/pftilh
quimo/i
racional/pmtidI
rato/pflhG
recorde/t
refrato/i
rego/pt
renascente/ti
rente/plh
representativo/pfd
riso/pl
ritual/ptim
romano/pftiEO
rotativo/ftidmp
sacerdotal/pi
salino/pfd
salto/pl
samba/t
sapato/pl
semifinal/pt
senso/i
separata/ti
seropositivo/pfd
servil/i
social/pmtiA
solfejo/tp
soturno/dfp
subjetivo/pfmtid
superficial/pmd
supranatural/ti
supremacia/ti
tecla/pt
tenebroso/dfp
tenro/fplh
termal/pidt
tolo/fplhG
total/pmtidp
tradicional/pmtid
trapo/pl
trasmontano/i
tratado/pft
trombeta/tp
ulterior/pmd
ultramoderno/i
urbano/fptid
urso/fplh
vascular/pd
vedeta/pi
vidro/pl
vinte/t
viril/pid
vital/ptid
voraz/dp
xilofone/pt
João/l
apreensível/d
café/pl
chapéu/pl
colaboração/pti
coleção/pti
compreensível/pdm
corrosível/d
disponível/pd
espaço/pl
exequível/dpm
imaculável/d
imperturbável/md
imóvel/pd
inatacável/d
incompatível/pd
incurável/pd
indisponível/dp
inexequível/d
insensível/pmd
intransmissível/dp
irredutível/pd
legível/pdm
lenço/pl
miserável/pt
muçulmano/pfi
passível/pd
pedaço/pl
previsível/pdm
pó/l
rentável/pd
sugestível/d
